Connecticut, session 2026, SB00204.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
one million five hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall
be used by the Department of Economic and Community Development
for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the town of Ashford to
establish a skilled trades center located at June Norcross Webster Scout
Reservation.